Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 25.1 Braille Instruction for Blind Students
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-25.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Blind student” means an individual who is eligible for special education services and who:

Has a visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with correcting lenses or has a limited field of vision so that the widest diameter subtends an angular distance of no greater than twenty degrees; or

Has a medically indicated expectation of visual deterioration.

“Braille” means the system of reading and writing through touch commonly known as standard English Braille.

“Individualized education program” means a written statement developed for a student eligible for special education services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 389, § 1.

16-25.1-2.
Development of program.

In developing the individualized educational program for those students who demonstrate loss of functional vision that renders the reading of print inefficient, the presumption shall be that proficiency in Braille reading and writing is essential for the student to achieve satisfactory educational progress. The assessment performed for each visually impaired student shall include a Braille skills inventory, including a statement of strengths and deficits. Braille instruction and use shall not be required if, in the course of developing the student’s individualized education program, all members of the planning and placement team concur that the student’s visual impairment does not affect reading and writing performance commensurate with his or her ability. The provision of other appropriate services shall not be precluded by the use of Braille. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the exclusive use of Braille if other special education services are appropriate to the student’s educational needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 389, § 1.

16-25.1-3.
Sufficiency of instruction.

Instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be sufficient to enable each blind student to communicate effectively and efficiently with the same level of proficiency expected of the student’s peers of comparable ability and grade level. The student’s individualized education program shall specify:

The results obtained from the inventory required pursuant to §

16-25.1-2

;

How Braille shall be implemented as the primary mode for learning through integration with other classroom activities;

The date on which Braille instruction shall commence;

The length of the period of instruction and the frequency and duration of each instructional session;

The level of competency in Braille reading and writing to be achieved by the end of the period and the objective assessment measures to be used; and

If a decision has been made pursuant to §

16-25.1-2

that Braille instruction or use is not required for the student:

A statement that the decision was reached after a review of pertinent literature describing the educational benefits of Braille instruction and use; and

A specification of the evidence used to determine that the student’s ability to read and write effectively without special education service is not impaired.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 389, § 1.

16-25.1-4.
Teacher certification.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall require teachers seeking certification to teach students who are blind or visually impaired to demonstrate competency in reading and writing Braille. The board shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of the general statutes, to establish standards for assessing competency that are consistent with the standards adopted by the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped, Library of Congress.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 29; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 29.